Utah statutes.
31A-12-104.   Insurance policies issued to school districts.
Insurance policies issued by the Risk Management Fund to school districts
under Section 63A-4-204 shall conform to Chapters 21 and 22. Policy forms
issued to the school district shall be filed under Section 31A-21-201. The
policy form filing fees of Section 31A-3-103 shall be paid to the Insurance
Department by the Risk Management Fund.
